Missouri, session 2026, HB3222.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 162.068, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 162.068, to read as follows:
162.068. 1. (1) By July 1, 2012, every school district shall adopt a written policy on
information that the district provides about former employees, both certificated and
noncertificated, to other public schools. By July 1, 2014, every charter school shall adopt a
written policy on information that the charter school provides about former employees, both
certificated and noncertificated, to other public schools. The policy shall include who is
permitted to respond to requests for information from potential employers and the
information the district or charter school would provide when responding to such a
request. The policy shall require that notice of this provision be provided to all current
employees and to all potential employers who contact the school district or charter school
regarding the possible employment of an employee.
(2) The policy described under this subsection shall require the district or charter
school to disclose, to any public school that contacts such district or charter school about a
former employee, information regarding any violation of the published regulations of the
board of education of the district or the governing body of the charter school by the former
employee if such violation related to sexual misconduct with a student and was determined to
be an actual violation by the board of the district or the governing body of the charter school
after a contested case due process hearing conducted pursuant to board policy.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3222 2
2. (1) Any school district or charter school that employs a person about whom the
children's division conducts an investigation involving allegations of sexual misconduct with
a student and reaches a finding of substantiated shall immediately suspend the employment of
such person, notwithstanding any other provision of law, but the district or charter school may
return the person to his or her employment if the child abuse and neglect review board's
finding that the allegation is substantiated is reversed by a court on appeal and becomes final.
Nothing shall preclude a school district or charter school from otherwise lawfully terminating
the employment of any employee about whom there has been a finding of unsubstantiated
resulting from an investigation by the children's division involving allegations of sexual
misconduct with a student.
(2) If at any time during an investigation involving allegations of sexual
misconduct by an employee of a school district or charter school the employee attempts
to resign from employment, the school district or charter school shall immediately
terminate the employee's employment. If the investigation is ongoing, termination of
employment shall not end such investigation. Any substantiated findings of sexual
misconduct shall be reported as provided by law.
3. Any employee who is permitted to respond to requests for information regarding
former employees under a policy adopted by his or her school district or charter school under
this section and who communicates only the information which such policy directs, and who
acts in good faith and without malice shall be immune against any civil action for damages
brought by the former employee arising out of the communication of such information. If any
such action is brought, the employee may, at his or her option, request the attorney general to
defend him or her in such suit and the attorney general shall provide such defense, except that
if the attorney general represents the school district or the department of elementary and
secondary education in a pending licensing matter under section 168.071,the attorney general
shall not represent the school district employee.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, if a district or
charter school that has employed any employee whose job involves contact with children
receives allegations of sexual misconduct, as provided in section 566.083, concerning the
employee and, as a result of such allegations or as a result of such allegations being
substantiated by the child abuse and neglect review board, dismisses the employee [or allows
the employee to resign in lieu of being fired] and fails to disclose the allegations of sexual
misconduct when furnishing a reference for the former employee or responding to a potential
employer's request for information regarding such employee, the district or charter school
shall be directly liable for damages to any student of a subsequent employing district or
charter school who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be a victim of the former
employee's sexual misconduct, and the district or charter school shall bear third-party liability

HB 3222 3
to the employing district or charter school for any legal liability, legal fees, costs, and
expenses incurred by the employing district or charter school caused by the failure to disclose
such information to the employing district or charter school.
5. If a school district or charter school has previously employed a person about whom
the children's division has conducted an investigation involving allegations of sexual
misconduct with a student and has reached a finding of substantiated and another public
school contacts the district or charter school for a reference for the former employee, the
district or charter school shall disclose the results of the children's division's investigation to
the public school.
6. Any school district or charter school employee, acting in good faith, who reports
alleged sexual misconduct on the part of a teacher or other school employee shall not be
discharged or otherwise discriminated against in any fashion because of such reporting.
7. Any school district or charter school shall, before offering employment to any
teacher who was employed by a Missouri school district or charter school, contact the
department of elementary and secondary education to determine the school district or charter
school that previously employed such employee. School districts and charter schools
contacting the department under this subsection shall request, from the most recent,
information as outlined in this section regarding the former employee.
✔